Utah statutes.
58-22-603.   Seal -- Authorized use.

(1)  A professional engineer or professional structural engineer may only affix the licensee's seal to a plan, specification, and report when the plan, specification, and report:

(a)  was personally prepared by the licensee;

(b)  was prepared by an employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter under the supervision of a licensee, provided the licensee or a principal affixing his seal assumes responsibility;

(c)  was prepared by a licensed professional engineer, professional structural engineer, or architect in this state or any other state provided:

(i)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review of all work for compliance with all applicable laws and rules and the standards of the profession; and

(ii)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan, specification, or report:

(A)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or

(B)  to a client who has contracted with a professional engineer or professional structural engineer for the design of a building or structure, when the licensee represents, or could reasonably expect the client to consider, the plan, specification, or report to be complete and final;

(d)  was prepared in part by a licensed professional engineer, professional structural engineer, or architect in this state or any other state provided:

(i)  the licensee in this state clearly identifies that portion of the plan, specification, or report for which the licensee is responsible;

(ii)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review of that portion of the plan, specification, or report for which the licensee is responsible for compliance with the standards of the profession; and

(iii)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan, specification, or report for which the licensee is responsible:

(A)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or

(B)  to a client who has contracted with a professional engineer or professional structural engineer for the design of a building or structure, when the licensee represents, or could reasonably expect the client to consider, the plans, specifications, or reports to be complete and final;

(e)  was prepared by a person exempt from licensure as a professional engineer, professional structural engineer, or architect provided that:

(i)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review for compliance with all applicable laws and rules and the standards of the profession; and

(ii)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan, specification, or report:

(A)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or

(B)  to a client who has contracted with a professional engineer, professional structural engineer, or architect for the design of a building or structure, when the licensee represents, or could reasonably expect the client to consider, the plan, specification, or report to be complete and final; or

(f)  meet any additional requirements established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.

(2)  A professional land surveyor may only affix the licensee's seal to a plan, map, sketch, survey, drawing, document, plat, and report when the plan, map, sketch, survey, drawing, document, plat, and report:

(a)  was personally prepared by the licensee; or

(b)  was prepared by an employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter under the supervision of a professional land surveyor, provided the professional land surveyor or a principal affixing his seal assumes responsibility.



Enacted by Chapter 259, 1996 General Session

